nl: Lokaas stijl: 3D-doel; Vlag; Drijver; Volledig lichaam; Schaal; Silhouet; Slaper; Sok; Draaiende vleugel; Spreider; Overige
th: สไตล์ของเหยื่อปลอม: เป้าหมาย 3 มิติ; ธง; แบบลอยน้ำ; เต็มตัว; แบบเปลือก; แบบโครงร่าง; แบบนอนหลับ; ถุงลม; ปีกหมุน; ตัวขึงลวด; อื่นๆ
da: Lokkemidlets stil: 3D-mål; Flag; Flyder; Helkrop; Skal; Silhuet; Sovende; Sok; Roterende vinger; Spreader; Andet
pt-BR: Estilo da isca: Alvo 3D; Bandeira; Flutuador; Corpo inteiro; Concha; Silhueta; Adormecido; Meia (biruta); Asa giratória; Expansor; Outro
sl-SI: Slog vabe: 3D-tarča; Zastava; Plavajoča vaba; Celo telo; Školjka; Silhueta; Speča vaba; Nogavica; Vrtljivo krilo; Razpiralnik; Drugo
sv: Lockbetestil: 3D-måltavla; Flagga; Flytvette; Helkropp; Skal; Silhuett; Sovande; Vindstrut; Snurrande vinge; Spridare; Övrigt
el: Στυλ δολώματος: Στόχος 3D; Σημαία; Επιπλέον; Ολόσωμο; Κέλυφος; Σιλουέτα; Που κοιμάται; Κάλτσα; Περιστρεφόμενα φτερά; Διανομέας; Άλλο
en: Decoy style: 3D target; Flag; Floater; Full body; Shell; Silhouette; Sleeper; Sock; Spinning wing; Spreader; Other
fi: Houkutintyyli: 3D-maali; Lippu; Kelluva; Kokovartalo; Kuori; Siluetti; Nukkuva; Sukka; Pyörivä siipi; Levitin; Muu
pl: Styl wabika: Cel 3D; Flaga; Pływający; Pełny korpus; Skorupa; Sylwetka; Śpiący; Skarpeta; Wirujące skrzydło; Spreader; Inne
hr-HR: Stil mamca: 3D meta; Zastava; Plutajući mamac; Cijelo tijelo; Polutijelo; Silueta; Spavač; Čarapa; Rotirajuće krilo; Raspršivač; Ostalo
hu: Csali stílusa: 3D-s célpont; Zászló; Úszó; Teljes testű; Héj; Sziluett; Alvó; Zsák; Forgó szárny; Terítő; Egyéb
ro-RO: Stilul de momeală: Țintă 3D; Steag; Plutitor; Corp întreg; Carcasă; Siluetă; Dormit; Ciorap; Aripă rotativă; Distribuitor; Altele
de: Stil des Lockvogels: 3D-Ziel; Flagge; Schwimmer; Ganzkörper; Schale; Silhouette; Schläfer; Windsack; Rotierende Flügel; Spreizer; Sonstige
es: Estilo del señuelo: Objetivo 3D; Bandera; Flotador; Cuerpo entero; Carcasa; Silueta; Durmiente; Manga; Alas giratorias; Esparcidor; Otro
cs: Styl návnady: 3D terč; Vlajka; Plovák; Celé tělo; Skořepina; Silueta; Spící; Rukávový; Rotující křídlo; Rozpěrka; Jiné
ko: 유인 모형 유형: 3D 표적; 깃발; 플로터; 풀 바디; 셸; 실루엣; 슬리퍼; 삭; 스피닝 윙; 스프레더; 기타
pt-PT: Estilo de isco: Alvo 3D; Bandeira; Flutuador; Corpo inteiro; Concha; Silhueta; A dormir; Manga; Asa giratória; Espalhador; Outro
vi: Kiểu mồi nhử: Mục tiêu 3D; Cờ; Nổi; Toàn thân; Vỏ ngoài; Hình bóng; Ngủ; Túi gió; Cánh xoay; Thanh giăng; Khác
tr: Mühre stili: 3B hedef; Bayrak; Yüzen; Tam gövde; Kabuk; Silüet; Uyuyan; Çorap; Dönen kanat; Yayıcı; Diğer
zh-CN: 假饵样式: 3D 目标; 旗帜; 漂浮诱饵; 全身诱饵; 壳式诱饵; 剪影诱饵; 睡眠诱饵; 袜式诱饵; 旋翼诱饵; 扩展诱饵; 其他
nb: Lokkefuglstil: 3D-mål; Flagg; Flyter; Helkropp; Skall; Silhuett; Sover; Sokk; Spinnende vinge; Spreder; Annet
lt-LT: Masalo stilius: 3D taikinys; Vėliava; Plūduras; Pilno korpuso; Kiautas; Siluetas; Miegantis; Kojinė; Besisukantis sparnas; Skėtiklis; Kita
ja: デコイスタイル: 3Dターゲット; フラッグ; フローター; フルボディ; シェル; シルエット; スリーパー; ソック; スピニングウィング; スプレッダー; その他
it: Stile esca: Bersaglio 3D; Bandiera; Galleggiante; Corpo intero; Guscio; Sagoma; Addormentato; A calza; Ali rotanti; Divaricatore; Altro
ru: Стиль манка: 3D-мишень; Флаг; Плавающее; Полнокорпусное; Скорлупа; Силуэт; Спящее; Флюгер-носок; С вращающимися крыльями; Система расстановки; Другое
bg-BG: Стил на примамката: 3D мишена; Флаг; Плаваща; Цяло тяло; Черупка; Силует; Спяща; Чорап; Въртящо се крило; Спредър; Друго
zh-TW: 誘餌樣式: 3D 標靶; 旗幟; 漂浮式; 全身; 外殼; 剪影; 睡眠; 襪狀型; 旋轉翅膀; 展布器; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl vábničky: 3D terč; Vlajka; Plávajúci; Celotelový; Škrupina; Silueta; Spiaci; Rukáv; S rotujúcimi krídlami; Rozperka; Iné
fr: Type de leurre: Cible 3D; Drapeau; Flottant; Corps entier; Coquille; Silhouette; Dormeur; Chaussette; Ailes tournantes; Écarteur; Autre